District of Columbia statutes.
26-1152.09

No increase in interest rate upon default.

A lender shall not make a covered loan that includes a provision that increases the covered loan’s interest rate upon a default. This section shall not apply to an interest rate increase in adjustable rate covered loans based on a recognized adjustable rate mortgage index and constant margin amount if an event of default or the acceleration of the maturity date of the covered loan does not cause or permit the increase in the interest rate.

History

May 7, 2002, D.C. Law 14-132, § 209, 49 DCR 2551

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 209 of Home Loan Protection Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-295, March 1, 2002, 49 DCR 2534).